Illinois, session 104th, HB2898.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-45.65 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.65 new)7    Sec. 5-45.65. Emergency rulemaking; increases to CILA site 8modification maximums. To provide for the expeditious and 9timely implementation of the changes made to Section 74 of the 10Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Administrative 11Act by this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, 12emergency rules implementing the changes made to Section 74 of 13the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 14Administrative Act may be adopted in accordance with Section 155-45 by the Department of Human Services. The adoption of 16emergency rules authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is 17deemed to be necessary for the public interest, safety, and 18welfare.19    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 20of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 21    Section 10. The Mental Health and Developmental 22Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by changing Section   HB2898- 2 -LRB104 10115 KTG 20187 b174 as follows: 2    (20 ILCS 1705/74)3    Sec. 74. Rates and reimbursements. 4    (a) Within 30 days after July 6, 2017 (the effective date 5of Public Act 100-23), the Department shall increase rates and 6reimbursements to fund a minimum of a $0.75 per hour wage 7increase for front-line personnel, including, but not limited 8to, direct support professionals, aides, front-line 9supervisors, qualified intellectual disabilities 10professionals, nurses, and non-administrative support staff 11working in community-based provider organizations serving 12individuals with developmental disabilities. The Department 13shall adopt rules, including emergency rules under subsection 14(y) of Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 15Act, to implement the provisions of this Section.16    (b) Rates and reimbursements. Within 30 days after June 4, 172018 (the effective date of Public Act 100-587), the 18Department shall increase rates and reimbursements to fund a 19minimum of a $0.50 per hour wage increase for front-line 20personnel, including, but not limited to, direct support 21professionals, aides, front-line supervisors, qualified 22intellectual disabilities professionals, nurses, and 23non-administrative support staff working in community-based 24provider organizations serving individuals with developmental 25disabilities. The Department shall adopt rules, including   HB2898- 3 -LRB104 10115 KTG 20187 b1emergency rules under subsection (bb) of Section 5-45 of the 2Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 3provisions of this Section.4    (c) Rates and reimbursements. Within 30 days after June 5, 52019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-10), subject to 6federal approval, the Department shall increase rates and 7reimbursements in effect on June 30, 2019 for community-based 8providers for persons with Developmental Disabilities by 3.5% 9The Department shall adopt rules, including emergency rules 10under subsection (jj) of Section 5-45 of the Illinois 11Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 12this Section, including wage increases for direct care staff.13    (d) For community-based providers serving persons with 14intellectual/developmental disabilities, subject to federal 15approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 16effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2022, 17shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 18to provide a $1.50 per hour wage increase for direct support 19professionals in residential settings and sufficient to 20provide wages for all residential non-executive direct care 21staff, excluding direct support professionals, at the federal 22Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 23as defined in rule by the Department.24    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 25methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 26with intellectual/developmental disabilities are subject to   HB2898- 4 -LRB104 10115 KTG 20187 b1federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 2defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 3rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 4of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 5provisions of this subsection (d). 6    (e) For community-based providers serving persons with 7intellectual/developmental disabilities, subject to federal 8approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 9effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2023, 10shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 11to provide a $1.00 per hour wage increase for all direct 12support professionals and all other frontline personnel who 13are not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average 14wage increases, who work in residential and community day 15services settings, with at least $0.50 of those funds to be 16provided as a direct increase to base wages, with the 17remaining $0.50 to be used flexibly for base wage increases. 18In addition, the rates taking effect for services delivered on 19or after January 1, 2023 shall include an increase sufficient 20to provide wages for all residential non-executive direct care 21staff, excluding direct support professionals, at the federal 22Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 23as defined in rule by the Department.24    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 25methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 26with intellectual/developmental disabilities are subject to   HB2898- 5 -LRB104 10115 KTG 20187 b1federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 2defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 3rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 4of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 5provisions of this subsection. 6    (f) For community-based providers serving persons with 7intellectual/developmental disabilities, subject to federal 8approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 9effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2024 10shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 11to provide a $2.50 per hour wage increase for all direct 12support professionals and all other frontline personnel who 13are not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average 14wage increases and who work in residential and community day 15services settings. At least $1.25 of the per hour wage 16increase shall be provided as a direct increase to base wages, 17and the remaining $1.25 of the per hour wage increase shall be 18used flexibly for base wage increases. In addition, the rates 19taking effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 202024 shall include an increase sufficient to provide wages for 21all residential non-executive direct care staff, excluding 22direct support professionals, at the federal Department of 23Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as defined in 24rule by the Department. 25    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 26methodologies for community-based services provided to persons   HB2898- 6 -LRB104 10115 KTG 20187 b1with intellectual/developmental disabilities are subject to 2federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 3defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 4rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 5of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 6provisions of this subsection. 7    (g) For community-based providers serving persons with 8intellectual or developmental disabilities, subject to federal 9approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 10effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2025 11shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 12to provide a $1 per hour wage rate increase for all direct 13support personnel and all other frontline personnel who are 14not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 15increases and who work in residential and community day 16services settings, with at least $0.75 of those funds to be 17provided as a direct increase to base wages and the remaining 18$0.25 to be used flexibly for base wage increases. These 19increases shall not be used by community-based providers for 20operational or administrative expenses. In addition, the rates 21taking effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 222025 shall include an increase sufficient to provide wages for 23all residential non-executive direct care staff, excluding 24direct support personnel, at the federal Department of Labor, 25Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as defined by rule by 26the Department. For services delivered on or after January 1,   HB2898- 7 -LRB104 10115 KTG 20187 b12025, the rates shall include adjustments to 2employment-related expenses as defined by rule by the 3Department. 4    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 5methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 6with intellectual or developmental disabilities are subject to 7federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 8defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 9rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 10of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 11provisions of this subsection. 12    (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 13for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities 14who are receiving Community Integrated Living Arrangement 15(CILA) residential services under the Home and Community-Based 16Services Waiver Program for Adults with Developmental 17Disabilities, beginning July 1, 2025, the Department of Human 18Services shall increase CILA site modification maximums as 19follows:20    (1) rented locations with a lease of less than 5 years 21shall have a $10,000 maximum reimbursement;22    (2) new construction shall have a $15,000 maximum 23reimbursement; and24    (3) existing structures that are owned by the person or 25CILA agency or have a long-term lease of 5 years or greater 26with a renewal at the end of the lease shall have a $30,000   HB2898- 8 -LRB104 10115 KTG 20187 b1maximum.2    Implementation of the increases is contingent upon federal 3approval, if required. The Department shall adopt rules, 4including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 5Illinois Administrative Procedure Act to implement the 6provisions of this Section.7(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 8102-830, eff. 1-1-23; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 96-30-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.